Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 3. Determination of Rights of Joint Users or Claimants

Cross references. —

As to appeals with reference to joint operation of irrigation and drainage districts generally, see §

41-6-104

.

§ 41-6-301.
Disagreements may be referred to water commissioner; action by commissioner; fees.

When two (2) or more persons, joint owners in an irrigation ditch or reservoir, not incorporated, or their lessees, are unable to agree relative to the division or distribution of water received through their ditch or from their reservoir, it shall be lawful for any of the owners or lessees to apply to the water commissioner of the district in which the ditch or reservoir shall be located, by a written notice setting forth that fact, asking the water commissioner to take charge of the ditch or reservoir for the purpose of making a just division or distribution of the water from the ditch or reservoir to the parties entitled to the use of the water. The water commissioner shall take exclusive charge of the ditch or reservoir for the purpose of dividing the water in accordance with rights established by existing decrees, and continuing the work until the necessity shall cease to exist. In all cases where the water commissioner or a deputy water commissioner is called upon to divide the waters of a ditch or reservoir between appropriators, when the term of his employment exceeds three (3) consecutive days he shall be paid in full for his service by the interested water users in proportion to the established rights of each. Any payments not made for the service of the water commissioner after a written demand has been made for payment, the bill for the water commissioner’s services shall be a lien upon any land or other property owned by an interested water user refusing to pay and may be recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction. Any reimbursement recovered under this section for services of the water commissioner shall be paid into the general fund.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 20; C.S. 1910, § 824; C.S. 1920, § 946; R.S. 1931, § 122-1303; C.S. 1945, § 71-2301; W.S. 1957, § 41-252; Laws 1991, ch. 157, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to assistant water commissioners, see §

41-3-611

.

Adjudication of joint ownership. —

Where court or court commissioner had authority to consider whether parties were joint owners, in proceeding under statute authorizing summary appointment of water distributor in case joint owners of ditch could not agree upon division of water, a former adjudication denying existence of such joint ownership could require finding in accordance therewith, but would not defeat jurisdiction. State ex rel. Mau v. Ausherman, 11 Wyo. 410, 72 P. 200,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 11 Wyo. 410, 73 P. 548,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1903).

Where in suit for unlawful diversion of water from ditch defendant relied on contract giving him joint interest therein upon enlarging it, defendant must affirmatively show he performed his part of the contract before court could find joint ownership. Mau v. Stoner, 10 Wyo. 125, 67 P. 618,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1902).

Not substitute for court action. —

Statute providing summary remedy through appointment of water distributor, where two or more joint owners of irrigation ditch were unable to agree as to diversion of water, was not substitute for action for damages or injunction. Stoner v. Mau, 11 Wyo. 366, 72 P. 193,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 11 Wyo. 366, 73 P. 548,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1903).

Remanding of case. —

In action to quiet title to water rights, the supreme court in holding that trial court erroneously failed to consider certain evidence, could not itself modify the judgment on such evidence for the purpose of an early adjudication of the rights of the parties, but could remand case, since water may have been temporarily divided between the parties under this section. Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

Statutory proceeding. —

Summary proceeding for appointment of a water distributor for a joint ditch was purely statutory and did not invoke the common law nor equitable jurisdiction of the district court. Mau v. Stoner, 12 Wyo. 478, 76 P. 584,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1904), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 183, 83 P. 218 (Wyo. 1905).

Right of appeal. —

Statutory proceeding for appointment of a water distributor upon a joint or partnership ditch, being special and summary and unknown to common law, legislature had power to deny a right of appeal from decision rendered in district court in such proceeding. Mau v. Stoner, 14 Wyo. 183, 83 P. 218,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1905).

Law reviews. —

For case note on Kearney Lake, Land & Reservoir Co. v. Lake DeSmet Reservoir Co., 487 P.2d 324,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1971), see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 599 (1972).

§ 41-6-302.
Actions for injunctions; notice; hearings; issuance of injunctions or restraining orders; bond.

In cases when suits for injunction are brought affecting the use of water from streams upon which the rights to the use of water have been adjudicated, no restraining order shall be granted by the court, judge or court commissioner, before hearing had after at least three (3) days notice thereof, served upon all persons defendant. All suits for injunction involving the use of water from streams shall be heard, either in term time or during vacation as the case may be, not later than fifteen (15) days after issues joined. In no case shall an injunction or restraining order be issued or become operative until the party obtaining the same executes an undertaking, to the defendants, with good and sufficient surety, to be approved by the clerk of the court granting the same, in an amount fixed by court, judge or commissioner allowing the same, conditioned to secure to the party enjoined all actual damages he may sustain if it be finally decided that the injunction or restraining order ought not to have been granted.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 21; C.S. 1910, § 4900; C.S. 1920, § 6170; R.S. 1931, § 89-3504; C.S. 1945, § 71-2302; W.S. 1957, § 41-253.

§ 41-6-303.
Relative interests of joint owners.

Unless the owners of ditches, canals and reservoirs make a record as herein provided, or have a record thereof made in some other manner, showing the relative ownership of each interested party in such irrigation works, said interests shall be established by the ratio between the water right of each water user to the total water rights adjudicated under such irrigation works. The relative interests of joint owners shall, therefore, be fixed by the issuance of the final certificate of appropriation as the same appears of record on the date of the passage of this act or as they shall hereafter be recorded in the office of the board of control and in the office of the respective county clerks, and no action for the recovery of the title to such irrigation works can be brought after ten (10) years from the date when the final certificates of appropriation have been recorded in the office of said county clerk; provided, that during such ten (10) years the interested water users as mentioned in the final certificates of appropriation, or their successors, have had continuous, open, adverse and undisputed possession of such irrigation works. Every conveyance of a ditch, canal or reservoir, or any interest therein, shall hereafter be executed and acknowledged in the same manner as a conveyance of real estate and recorded as herein provided, and any such conveyance which shall not be made in conformity with the provisions of this act, shall be null and void as against subsequent purchasers thereof in good faith and for a valuable consideration.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 22; C.S. 1910, § 807; C.S. 1920, § 928; R.S. 1931, § 122-501; C.S. 1945, § 71-2303; W.S. 1957, § 41-254.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” refers to Laws 1907, ch. 86, which have been codified in titles 9, 14, 17 and 41. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Section contemplates that joint user may acquire an interest by prescription

in an irrigation ditch. White v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 413 P.2d 252,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1966).

Interest in ditch. —

As an incident to its power to adjudicate priorities, the board of control must determine whether one claiming an appropriation for irrigation has sufficient interest in the ditch to be used for conveying the water, and while its determination may not conclude a subsequent judicial determination of interest or ownership, the water commissioner may act upon such determination of interest in distributing water upon the certificate of appropriation, in the absence of any other lawful determination. Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1911).

Proportionate interests. —

Contract whereby development company conveyed land and water rights and required purchaser and successors in interest to pay pro rata share of costs of maintaining irrigation works did not convey thereby any proportionate interest in the irrigation work. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Equitable apportionment of costs. —

Where plaintiff landowners had appropriation rights in a canal, the establishment of a reasonable annual water delivery fee by defendant irrigation district for maintenance and operation of the canal had to be based on an equitable apportionment under this section determined after a consideration of various factors. The landowner's claim that they could select the expenses to which their ratio was applied and that the irrigation district was required to maintain separate records of the actual expenses requisite to the proper maintenance of the creek diversion and the canal was supported by this section.
Rageth v. Sidon Irrigation Dist., 2011 WY 121, 258 P.3d 712,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2011).

“Record.” —

In action for determination of water rights in irrigation ditch under §

41-6-308

, the decree of the court is a “record” within this section prescribing rule for establishing ownership of ditches and other irrigation works unless the owners “make a record as herein provided or have a record thereof made in some other manner showing the relative ownership of each interested party.” Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

Supreme court review. —

In action to quiet title to rights in a ditch in which lower court based its finding solely upon proof of adequate water rights under this section, without considering other evidence, supreme court in holding statute unapplicable will not modify judgment upon evidence not considered by trial court, but will remand the case. Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

Quoted

in

Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Dodge, 387 P.2d 679,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1963); Wallis v. Luman, 625 P.2d 759,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Linck v. Brown, 55 Wyo. 100, 96 P.2d 909,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(1939); Bard Ranch, Inc. v. Weber, 538 P.2d 24,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1975).

Law reviews. —

For article “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227 (1950).

§ 41-6-304.
Affidavits of interest; parties joining in; filing; contents.

Any person, persons, partnership or association of individuals, or corporation, may file in the office of the board of control, and in the office of the county clerk of the county wherein any ditch, reservoir or other irrigation works shall be located, an affidavit, duly sworn to before an officer authorized to acknowledge deeds, or before a water superintendent of this state, joined in, signed, and sworn to by all the parties having an interest in such ditch or ditch right, or by the guardian of any such person, if insane or a minor, or in case of a corporation by any two (2) of its officers, stating therein the name of the ditch, the ownership of said ditch, the interest each claimant owns therein specifically, the method of securing rights of way or irrigation works and the date of such procedure and referring to the records of the office of the state engineer or board of control, or both, relative to dimensions of irrigation works, their location, and adjudicated rights to water conveyed in or stored in such works and such other information as may be deemed necessary.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 23; C.S. 1910, § 808; C.S. 1920, § 929; R.S. 1931, § 122-502; C.S. 1945, § 71-2304; W.S. 1957, § 41-255.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oath, see §

1-2-102

.

Applied

in

Bard Ranch, Inc. v. Weber, 538 P.2d 24,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1975).

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911); Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

.

§ 41-6-305.
Affidavits of interest; as evidence; statute of limitations for civil actions upon.

When said affidavit hereinbefore mentioned has been duly executed and filed and recorded as hereinbefore prescribed, the facts therein stated shall be prima facie evidence of the truth thereof in any court of the United States, and no action for the recovery of the title or possession of such irrigation works can be brought after ten (10) years from the time of the recording of such affidavit; provided, that during such ten (10) years the claimant as mentioned in such affidavit, or his successor, in rights, has been in continuous, open and undisputed possession of such irrigation works.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 24; C.S. 1910, § 809; C.S. 1920, § 930; R.S. 1931, § 122-503; C.S. 1945, § 71-2305; W.S. 1957, § 41-256.

Proportionate interests. —

Contract whereby development company conveyed land and water rights and required purchaser and successors in interest to pay pro rata share of costs of maintaining irrigation works did not convey thereby any proportionate interest in the irrigation works. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911); Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

.

§ 41-6-306.
Affidavits of interest; transfer of interests after filing.

Any transfer made to a purchaser in good faith and for a valuable consideration, of any such irrigation works after the expiration of ten (10) years from the filing of the affidavit as hereinbefore provided, shall vest in the grantee of such transfer an absolute title in fee simple, free from the claims of any person whatsoever, to the extent that such irrigation works are claimed in the said affidavit of such grantor or his predecessor in interest, unless before the expiration of said ten (10) years any other party claiming an interest in such irrigation works has filed in the office of the county clerk of the county wherein his, her, or its land, irrigated by such ditch, may be situated, an affidavit as mentioned in section 23 hereof [§

41-6-304

].

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 25; C.S. 1910, § 810; C.S. 1920, § 931; R.S. 1931, § 122-504; C.S. 1945, § 71-2306; W.S. 1957, § 41-257.

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911); Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

.

§ 41-6-307.
Affidavits of interest; perjured statements.

Any person who knowingly falsely states his or her ownership in such irrigation works, or the extent thereof, or any guardian who in like manner makes such statement on behalf of his or her ward, or any person who in like manner makes such a statement on behalf of a corporation, shall be guilty of perjury and upon conviction thereof shall be punished.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 26; C.S. 1910, § 811; C.S. 1920, § 932; R.S. 1931, § 122-505; C.S. 1945, § 71-2307; W.S. 1957, § 41-258.

Cross references. —

As to perjury generally, see §

6-5-301

et seq.

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911); Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

.

§ 41-6-308.
Action in equity to determine rights of claimants; construction of act.

Where the ownership of any irrigation works is disputed, or jointly claimed by any person, partnership or corporation, and the several owners cannot agree upon the amount of interest owned by each, and one (1) or more claimants of such right desire the filing of the affidavit as hereinbefore mentioned, while the other or others do not desire to join therein, one (1) or more such claimants may bring an action in equity in the district court of any county wherein the land or parts of the land affected by such ditch or ditch right is located, and said court shall determine the right of the several claimants to such ditch or ditch right, and determine all the facts necessary in the affidavit hereinbefore prescribed, and such decree shall, after being filed and recorded in the office of the county clerk of the proper county as hereinbefore prescribed, have the same force and effect as the affidavit hereinbefore prescribed; provided, that the provisions of W.S.

41-6-303

through

41-6-308

shall not be construed to relate to water rights, or in any way to conflict with the laws governing the same.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 27; C.S. 1910, § 812; C.S. 1920, § 933; R.S. 1931, § 122-506; C.S. 1945, § 71-2308; W.S. 1957, § 41-259.

District court has jurisdiction. —

The legislature intended for the appropriate district court to have jurisdiction of an action where the ownership of any irrigation work is disputed or jointly claimed and the several owners cannot agree upon the amount of interest owned by each. Bard Ranch, Inc. v. Weber, 538 P.2d 24,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 541 P.2d 791,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1975).

District court may clarify ownership rights based on recorded contract. —

A contract between the respective predecessors in interest of the parties which has been appropriately recorded is not the exclusive means of acquiring ownership of irrigation works, and the legislature cannot be said to have intended that the existence of such a contract would foreclose the parties from legal remedy to clarify their rights in favor of perpetual confusion and continuing controversy. Bard Ranch, Inc. v. Weber, 538 P.2d 24,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 541 P.2d 791,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1975).

Record of interests. —

This section provides for having record of relative interests made by an action in equity, and covers point of “having a record made,” as contemplated by §

41-6-303

.Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

Adverse possession. —

In action to quiet title to rights in ditch under this section, either of the parties may assert title by adverse possession, notwithstanding §

41-6-303

.Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911).